Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 7 Medical Assistance Generally
49-4-152.3.
Reuse of unit dosage drugs.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Long-term care facility” or “facility” means an intermediate care home, skilled nursing home, or intermingled home subject to regulation as such by the Department of Community Health.

“Unit dosage drug” means any dangerous drug regulated under Chapter 13 of Title 16 which is individually packaged to contain only one dosage of such drug and which includes on such packaging the brand or generic name, strength, lot number, and expiration date of such drug.

Unit dosage drugs may be returned to the dispensing pharmacy for reuse. The department and the State Board of Pharmacy shall promulgate regulations which permit the reuse of prescribed but unused unit dosage drugs for a resident of a long-term care facility other than the resident for whom the drug was originally prescribed, but only when:

The cost of those drugs has been paid for or reimbursed under this article; and

The drugs are unused because the resident for whom the drugs were originally prescribed:

Has died;

Has had such resident’s prescription changed so as no longer to require those drugs; or

Otherwise no longer needs those drugs.

The consent of the resident for whom the unused drugs were originally prescribed shall not be required for such reuse of prescribed unit doses. Such reuse shall only be authorized by a resident of a long-term care facility for whom the specific dosage of that unused drug has been prescribed when payment or reimbursement for that drug for that resident is otherwise permitted under this article. Nothing in this Code section shall require a pharmaceutical manufacturer to provide a rebate based on the reuse of any unused unit dosage drug.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 939, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-4/HB 228.

49-4-152.4.
Department contracts to require refund of prescription drug rebates.

The department shall provide that any department contract with a provider of medical assistance which is renewed or executed on or after July 1, 1997, shall require a refund to the department of any prescription drug rebate, as established in this article or in federal law in Section 1927 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, as amended, obtained by the provider for prescription drugs furnished to recipients of medical assistance pursuant to that contract.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1385, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, this Code section, enacted as Code Section 49-4-152.3, was redesignated as Code Section 49-4-152.4.

U.S. Code.

Section 1927 of Title XIX of the Social Security Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

r-8.

49-4-152.5.
Restocking fees.

In the provision of medical assistance pursuant to this article, the department shall allow for the payment and coverage of appropriate restocking fees incurred by a pharmacy which receives and dispenses unused over-the-counter and prescription drugs pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 8 of Title 31.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 152, § 2/HB 1178; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 49/SB 46; Ga. L. 2016, p. 524, § 3/HB 897.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “unused over-the-counter and prescription drugs pursuant to Article 10 of Chapter 8 of Title 31” for “prescription drugs pursuant to Article 11 of Chapter 4 of Title 26, the ‘Utilization of Unused Prescription Drugs Act’ ” at the end of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 enactment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 197 (2006).

49-4-152.6.
Medicaid coverage for mood disorders prescriptions.

The department shall provide Medicaid coverage for any prescription drug prescribed to an adult patient and determined by a duly licensed practitioner in this state to be medically necessary for the treatment and prevention of mood disorders with psychotic symptoms, including, but not limited to, bipolar disorders, schizophrenia and schizotypal, or delusion disorders if:

During the preceding year, the patient was prescribed and unsuccessfully treated with a preferred or generic drug; or

The patient has previously been prescribed and obtained prior approval for the nonpreferred prescribed drug.

If necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-152.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 6-5/HB 1013.

Effective date.

This Code section became effective July 1, 2022.

49-4-153.
Administrative hearings and appeals; judicial review; contested cases involving imposition of remedial or punitive measure against nursing facility.

The Board of Community Health is authorized to establish regulations regarding the manner in which the appeals set forth in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be conducted.

Any applicant for medical assistance whose application is denied or is not acted upon with reasonable promptness and any recipient of medical assistance aggrieved by the action or inaction of the Department of Community Health as to any medical or remedial care or service which such recipient alleges should be reimbursed under the terms of the state plan which was in effect on the date on which such care or service was rendered or is sought to be rendered shall be entitled to a hearing upon his or her request for such in writing and in accordance with the applicable rules and regulations of the department and the Office of State Administrative Hearings. With respect to appeals regarding whether a treatment for a mental health or substance abuse disorder is medically necessary, the administrative law judge shall make such determination using the definitions provided in Code Section 33-21A-13. As a result of the written request for hearing, a written recommendation shall be rendered in writing by the administrative law judge assigned to hear the matter. Should a decision be adverse to a party and should a party desire to appeal that decision, the party must file a request in writing to the commissioner or the commissioner’s designated representative within 30 days of his or her receipt of the hearing decision. The commissioner, or the commissioner’s designated representative, has 30 days from the receipt of the request for appeal to affirm, modify, or reverse the decision appealed from. A final decision or order adverse to a party, other than the agency, in a contested case shall be in writing or stated in the record. A final decision shall include findings of fact and conclusions of law, separately stated, and the effective date of the decision or order. Findings of fact shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts supporting the findings. Each agency shall maintain a properly indexed file of all decisions in contested cases, which file shall be open for public inspection except those expressly made confidential or privileged by statute. If the commissioner fails to issue a decision, the initial recommended decision shall become the final administrative decision of the commissioner.

A provider of medical assistance may request a hearing on a decision of the Department of Community Health with respect to a denial or nonpayment of or the determination of the amount of reimbursement paid or payable to such provider on a certain item of medical or remedial care of service rendered by such provider by filing a written request for a hearing in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 and 50-13-15 with the Department of Community Health. The Department of Community Health shall, within 15 business days of receiving the request for hearing from the provider, transmit a copy of the provider’s request for hearing to the Office of State Administrative Hearings. The provider’s request for hearing shall identify the issues under appeal and specify the relief requested by the provider. The request for hearing shall be filed no later than 15 business days after the provider of medical assistance receives the decision of the Department of Community Health which is the basis for the appeal.

The Office of State Administrative Hearings shall assign an administrative law judge to hear the dispute within 15 days after receiving the request. The hearing is required to commence no later than 90 days after the assignment of the case to an administrative law judge, and the administrative law judge shall issue a written decision on the matter no later than 30 days after the close of the record except when it is determined that the complexity of the issues and the length of the record require an extension of these periods and an order is issued by an administrative law judge so providing, but no longer than 30 days. Such time requirements can be extended by written consent of all the parties. Failure of the administrative law judge to comply with the above time deadlines shall not render the case moot.

A request for hearing by a nursing home provider shall stay any recovery or recoupment action.

Should the decision of the administrative law judge be adverse to a party and should a party desire to appeal that decision, the party must file a request therefor, in writing, with the commissioner within ten days of his or her receipt of the hearing decision. Such a request must enumerate all factual and legal errors alleged by the party. The commissioner, or the commissioner’s designated representative, may affirm, modify, or reverse the decision appealed from.

A person or institution who either has been refused enrollment as a provider in the state plan or has been terminated as a provider by the Department of Community Health shall be entitled to a hearing; provided, however, that no entitlement to a hearing before the department shall lie for refusals or terminations based on the want of any license, permit, certificate, approval, registration, charter, or other form of permission issued by an entity other than the Department of Community Health, which form of permission is required by law either to render care or to receive medical assistance in which federal financial participation is available. The final determination (subject to judicial review, if any) of such an entity denying issuance of such a form of permission shall be binding on and unreviewable by the Department of Community Health. In cases where an entitlement to a hearing before the Department of Community Health, pursuant to this paragraph, lies, the Department of Community Health shall give written notice of either the denial of enrollment or termination from enrollment to the affected person or institution; and such notice shall include the reasons of the Department of Community Health for denial or termination. Should such a person or institution desire to contest the initial decision of the Department of Community Health, he or she must give written notice of his or her appeal to the commissioner of community health within ten days after the date on which the notice of denial or notice of termination was transmitted to him or her. A hearing shall be scheduled and commenced within 20 days after the date on which the commissioner receives the notice of appeal; and the commissioner or his or her designee or designees shall render a final administrative decision as soon as practicable thereafter.

If any aggrieved party exhausts all the administrative remedies provided in this Code section, judicial review of the final decision of the commissioner may be obtained by filing a petition within 30 days after the service of the final decision of the commissioner or, if a rehearing is requested, within 30 days after the decision thereon. The petition may be filed in the Superior Court of Fulton County or in the superior court of the county of residence of the petitioner. When the petitioner is a corporation, the action may be brought in the Superior Court of Fulton County or in the superior court of the county where the petitioner maintains its principal place of doing business in this state. Copies of the petition shall be served upon the commissioner and all parties of record. The petition shall state the nature of the petitioner’s interest, the facts showing that the petitioner is aggrieved by the decision, and any grounds upon which the petitioner contends that the decision should be reversed or modified. Judicial review of the commissioner’s decision may be obtained in the same manner and under the same standards as are applicable to those contested cases which are reviewable pursuant to Code Section 50-13-19; provided, however, that no other provision of Chapter 13 of Title 50 shall be applicable to the department with the exception of Code Sections 50-13-13 and 50-13-15. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a stay of the commissioner’s final decision may be granted by a reviewing court to a provider of medical assistance only on condition that such provider posts bond with the commissioner in favor of the state, with good and sufficient surety thereon by a surety company licensed to do business in this state, in an amount determined by the commissioner to be sufficient to recompense the state for all medical assistance which otherwise would not be paid to the provider but for the granting of such a stay. A stay may be granted and renewed for time intervals up to three months, so long as bond is posted for every interval of time in which the stay is in effect.

All contested cases involving the imposition of a remedial or punitive measure against a nursing facility by the Department of Community Health shall be conducted in the manner provided for in subsection (l) of Code Section 31-2-8, but only if such remedial or punitive measure is based upon findings made by the Department of Community Health in its capacity as the state survey agency for the Georgia Medicaid program.

A dentist acting pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 33-21A-8 or a provider of medical assistance may request a hearing on a decision of a care management organization with respect to the provisions set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 33-21A-8 or with respect to a denial or nonpayment of or the determination of the amount of reimbursement paid or payable to such provider on a certain item of medical or remedial care of service rendered by such provider by filing a written request for a hearing in accordance with Code Sections 50-13-13 and 50-13-15 with the Department of Community Health. The Department of Community Health shall, within 15 business days of receiving the request for hearing from the provider, transmit a copy of the provider’s request for hearing to the Office of State Administrative Hearings but shall not be a party to the proceedings. The provider’s request for hearing shall identify the care management organization with which the provider has a dispute, the issues under appeal, and specify the relief requested by the provider. The request for hearing shall be filed no later than 15 business days after the provider of medical assistance receives the decision of the care management organization which is the basis for the appeal. Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be authorized to allow a provider of medical assistance to consolidate pending complaints or claims against a care management organization that are based on the same or similar payment or coverage issues, as determined by such administrative law judge. Such consolidation shall include disposition of the same or similar claims through a single hearing that adjudicates the total amount of such consolidated claims.

The Office of State Administrative Hearings shall assign an administrative law judge to hear the dispute within 15 days after receiving the request. The hearing is required to commence no later than 90 days after the assignment of the case to an administrative law judge, and the administrative law judge shall issue a written decision on the matter no later than 30 days after the close of the record except when it is determined that the complexity of the issues and the length of the record require an extension of these periods and an order is issued by an administrative law judge so providing, but no longer than 30 days. Such time requirements can be extended by written consent of all the parties. Failure of the administrative law judge to comply with the above time deadlines shall not render the case moot.

The decision of the administrative law judge shall be the final administrative remedy available to the provider. Review thereafter shall proceed in accordance with Code Section 50-13-19. The fees and expenses of the Office of State Administrative Hearings may, at the administrative law judge’s discretion, be assessed against the party against whom the administrative law judge enters his or her order.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 12; Ga. L. 1988, p. 288, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1290, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1856, § 2; Ga. L. 1997, p. 679, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 576, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24; Ga. L. 2006, p. 775, §§ 4, 5/SB 572; Ga. L. 2008, p. 704, § 2/HB 1234; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-53/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214; Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 1-8/HB 1013.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Code Section 31-2-8” for “Code Section 31-2-11” in the middle of subsection (d).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second sentence in paragraph (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 1-1/HB 1013, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This part shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Mental Health Parity Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 1-9/HB 1013, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “If necessary to implement any of the provisions of this part relating to the Medicaid program, the Department of Community Health shall submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 26, § 1-10/HB 1013, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Nothing in this part shall be construed to impair any contracts in effect on June 30, 2022.”

Law reviews.

For survey article on administrative law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2007).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2009).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1856, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 1994, for purposes of commencing transfer of positions, independent hearing officers, employees, and equipment and for general administrative purposes. The Office of State Administrative Hearings may commence the performance of its duties on and after July 1, 1994, and shall assume full responsibility for the performance of its duties on and after April 1, 1995. The Office of State Administrative Hearings shall, where necessary for any class of hearings, promulgate rules and regulations in order to comply with all federal and state procedural requirements. During the period between July 1, 1994, and April 1, 1995, covered agencies may continue to conduct covered administrative hearings as provided by prior law; but on and after April 1, 1995, all such hearings in new and, where practical, in pending proceedings shall be conducted as provided in this Act.”

49-4-154.
Powers and duties retained by Department of Human Resources (Department of Community Health).

The status, position, and rights of persons transferred from the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Community Health for these purposes) to the Department of Medical Assistance pursuant to Ga. L. 1977, p. 384 shall not be affected by the transfer, in and of itself; and such persons shall retain, inter alia, all rights of rank or grade; rights to vacation, sick pay, and leave; rights under any retirement plan; and any other rights under any law or administrative policy.

The Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Community Health for these purposes) shall retain, in accordance with terms of the state plan, the functions, and all tangible things and employees relating thereto, of:

Establishing and maintaining certain standards for certain institutions and agencies seeking to become or remain providers and shall finally determine and certify whether such institutions and agencies meet such standards;

Determining and certifying the eligibility of certain applicants for and recipients of medical assistance; and

Prescribing regulations to require that applicants for medical assistance be given clear and easily understandable notice that all books, papers, records, and memoranda of the provider relating to the provision of medical assistance to the applicant will be made available, upon request, to the commissioner of medical assistance or his representative and that, by accepting medical assistance, the applicant thereby consents to the providing of such books, papers, records, and memoranda to the commissioner of medical assistance or his representative.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 13; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-54/HB 228.

49-4-155.
Department of Community Health to succeed to existing rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders.

The Department of Community Health shall succeed to all the rules, regulations, policies, procedures, and administrative orders of the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) transferred to the Department of Medical Assistance pursuant to the previously existing provisions of this Code section and that are in effect on June 30, 1999, and shall further succeed to any rights, privileges, entitlements, obligations, and duties of the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) that are in effect on June 30, 1999, to which the Department of Medical Assistance succeeded pursuant to the previously existing provisions of Code Section 49-4-156.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 14; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 20; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-55/HB 228.

49-4-156.
[Reserved] Tax exemption for health maintenance organizations with respect to contracts pursuant to this article.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 125, § 1, effective July 1, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Code 1981, §

49-4-156

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 1438, § 3/SB 140.

49-4-156.1.
Reimbursement for services rendered under Article 5 of Chapter 6 of this title.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that the Department of Community Health be authorized to take those actions necessary to provide reimbursement under this article for services rendered under Article 5 of Chapter 6 of this title, relating to community care for the elderly.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 2; Code 1981, §

49-4-156.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2248, § 3; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “this title” was substituted for “Title 49”.

49-4-157.
Construction of this article with federal act.

It is the intention of the General Assembly that this article be construed consistently with Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, as amended, and so as to authorize the Department of Community Health, within the appropriations provided to it, to administer the state plan in a manner so as to receive the maximum amount of federal financial participation available in expenditures made under the state plan.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 384, § 16; Ga. L. 1999, p. 296, § 24.

U.S. Code.

Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act of 1935, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

42 U.S.C. § 1396

et seq.

49-4-158.
Certain dependents of military service members to maintain eligibility and priority for certain medical assistance and developmental disability services under certain conditions; waiver to implement such provision; compliance with certain federal laws, rules, and regulations; definitions.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Dependent” means a spouse, birth child, adopted child, or stepchild of a military service member.

“Legal resident” means a person who maintains Georgia as his or her principal establishment, home of record, or permanent home and to where, whenever absent due to military obligation, he or she intends to return.

“Military service” means service in the armed forces or armed forces reserves of the United States, or membership in the Georgia National Guard.

“Military service member” means a person who is currently in military service or who has separated from military service in the previous 18 months through either retirement or military separation.

The department shall allow legal residents who are dependents of a military service member and who are absent from this state due to the member’s military service to be added to a data base to indicate the need for medical assistance upon return to this state. Should a dependent in such a situation be selected from a data base to receive medical assistance, the dependent shall have six months from the date of the selection notification to apply for such assistance and another six months to commence using such assistance. In the event a dependent is receiving medical assistance funded by the department and the medical assistance is disrupted due to the military service member’s need for the dependent to leave Georgia because of such military service member’s military service, the medical assistance shall be resumed upon the dependent’s return to Georgia if the dependent is otherwise eligible. In no case shall payment be made for home and community based services provided outside this state. A dependent of a military service member shall be required to provide the department with:

A copy of the military service member’s DD-214 or other equivalent discharge paperwork; and

Proof of the military service member’s legal residence in this state, as prescribed by the department.

A dependent who is a legal resident of this state, having previously been determined to be eligible for developmental disability services provided by the department, including waiver services provided under the home and community based services programs authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act, shall retain eligibility for those developmental disability services as long as he or she remains a legal resident of this state, regardless of having left this state due to the military service member’s military assignment outside this state, as long as he or she is otherwise eligible for such services.

The department shall permit a dependent who resides outside this state to be placed on a waiting list for developmental disability services if the dependent left this state due to the military service member’s military assignment outside this state, is otherwise eligible for those services, and furnishes:

A copy of the military service member’s DD-214 or other equivalent discharge paperwork; and

Proof of the military service member’s legal residence in this state, as prescribed by the department.

For dependents who received developmental disability services and who left this state due to the military service member’s military assignment outside this state, upon the dependent’s return to this state and when a request for services is made, the department shall:

Determine the dependent’s eligibility for services, which may include a request for waiver services provided under the home and community based services programs authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act;

Provide to the dependent notification of the determination of eligibility for services, which includes notification of a denial of services if applicable;

Provide the dependent an opportunity to contest the department’s determination through the appeals processes established by the department; and

Resume services if the dependent remains eligible.

As a condition of continued eligibility for services under subsection (e) of this Code section, a dependent must inform the department of his or her current address and provide updates as requested by the department.

No payment pursuant to this Code section shall be made for developmental disability services authorized under this chapter and provided outside this state unless those services satisfy the conditions specified in 42 CFR 431.52. No payment pursuant to this Code section shall be made for home and community based services provided outside this state.

The department shall request a waiver from the appropriate federal agency if a waiver is necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section.

The department may adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section.

This Code section shall only apply to the fullest extent permissible for Georgia to remain in compliance with all federal laws, rules, and regulations associated with the services provided in this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 337, § 3-1/HB 962; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 49/SB 365.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2016.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “developmental disability” for “developmental disabilities” in subsection (d).

49-4-159.
Medicaid coverage for lactation and postpartum care.

The department shall provide Medicaid coverage for:

Lactation care and services, as defined in paragraph (5) of Code Section 43-22A-3, to pregnant and lactating women and to children who are breastfeeding or receiving their mother’s milk; and

Postpartum care for mothers for a period of one year following the date the pregnancy ends.

If necessary to implement the provisions of this Code section, the department shall submit a Medicaid state plan amendment or waiver request to the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-159

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 224, § 1/HB 1114; Ga. L. 2022, p. 759, § 1/SB 338.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 16, 2020.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in paragraph (a)(2), substituted “one year” for “six months”, and “pregnancy ends” for “woman gives birth” at the end.

Cross references.

Newborn Baby and Mother Protection Act,
§

33-24-58.2

.

Lactation Consultant Practice, §

43-22A-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 224, § 2/HB 1114, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the enactment of this Code section was contingent upon a specific appropriation of funds for purposes of this Act. Funding was appropriated in 2020.

49-4-159.1.
State plan amendment to implement express lane eligibility in Medicaid and the PeachCare for Kids Program; enrollment and renewal.

No later than June 30, 2022, the department shall submit a state plan amendment to the federal Department of Health and Human Services to implement express lane eligibility in accordance with section 1902(e)(13) of the federal Social Security Act to determine whether a child meets one or more of the eligibility criteria for and enroll the child in Medicaid and the PeachCare for Kids Program. Such state plan amendment shall include, but not be limited to, reliance on a finding made by the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services in determining eligibility of applicants for the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other programs as identified by the department and the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services.

Upon approval of a state plan amendment, the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services shall employ express lane eligibility by evaluating data received from applicants for the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program and other programs, as identified by the department and the Division of Family and Children Services of the Department of Human Services, to determine eligibility for Medicaid and the PeachCare for Kids Program and to provide for automatic enrollment and renewal of eligible children in Medicaid and the PeachCare for Kids Program.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4-159.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 345, § 1/HB 163.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.